Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-410
Legislative intent to appropriate.

It is the intent of the Legislature to appropriate two hundred fifty thousand dollars beginning in FY2022-23 through FY2026-27 to carry out the Resilient Soils and Water Quality Act.

Laws 2022, LB925, § 6.

Resilient Soils and Water Quality Act, see section 2-405.